Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-2905
Annual audit report; supplemental report; copies; filing; public records; retain for five years.

At least three copies of the annual audit report shall be properly signed and attested by the accountant, two copies shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality involved, and one copy shall be filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts. The copy of the annual audit report submitted to the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be accompanied by a supplemental report, if appropriate, by the accountant making the audit identifying any illegal acts or indications of illegal acts discovered as a result of the audit.

The annual audit report filed, together with any accompanying comment or explanation, shall become a part of the public records of the clerk of the municipality involved and shall at all times thereafter be open and subject to public inspection. The copies filed with the auditor shall be kept as a part of the public records in that office for at least five years and shall at all times be subject to public inspection.

Laws 1959, c. 69, § 5, p. 297;

Laws 1969, c. 93, § 2, p. 459;

Laws 1975, LB 446, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 1115, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 568, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 174.
September 1, 2019